Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB614.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-MFQHC PRIMARY CARE WORKFORCE INITIATIVE Section 101-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accredited medical college." As follows:(1) As defined under section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.(2) An osteopathic medical college as defined under section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(3) An institution of higher education that meets the requirements of section 6.1 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law.(4) A program at an institution of higher education that meets the requirements of 49 Pa. Code § 18.131 (relating to recognized educational programs/standards).(5) A program at an institution of higher education that meets the requirements of 49 Pa. Code § 25.151 (relating to certification of physician assistant educational programs).(6) An institution of higher education that meets the requirements of section 3(c) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as The Dental Law.20250SB0614PN1530 - 2 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 "Certified registered nurse practitioner." An individual licensed as a certified registered nurse practitioner under The Professional Nursing Law."Dentist." An individual licensed in the practice of dentistry under The Dental Law."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."FQHC." A federally qualified health center as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 1395x(aa)(4) (relating to definitions)."ELIGIBLE ADMINISTRATIVE ENTITY." AN ORGANIZATION THAT:(1) IS THE FEDERALLY DESIGNATED PRIMARY CARE ASSOCIATION FOR THIS COMMONWEALTH UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 254B (RELATING TO HEALTH CENTERS);(2) REPRESENTS, SUPPORTS AND PROVIDES TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO FQHCS OR FQHC LOOK-ALIKES IN THIS COMMONWEALTH; AND(3) HAS STATEWIDE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTING PRIMARILY OF FQHCS OR FQHC LOOK-ALIKES."FACILITATING ENTITY." AN ENTITY THAT PARTICIPATES IN COORDINATING, SUPPORTING OR FACILITATING CLINICAL ROTATION PLACEMENTS UNDER THE INITIATIVE, INCLUDING THE DEPARTMENT, AN FQHC, AN FQHC LOOK-ALIKE, A RURAL HOSPITAL, A RURAL HEALTH CLINIC OR AN ELIGIBLE ADMINISTRATIVE ENTITY. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A STUDENT OR PRECEPTOR."FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER" OR "FQHC." A HEALTH CENTER THAT RECEIVES A FEDERAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES GRANT UNDER THE PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICE ACT (58 STAT. 682, 42 U.S.C. § 254B) OR ANOTHER HEALTH CENTER DESIGNATED BY THE UNITED STATES HEALTH RESOURCES AND SERVICES ADMINISTRATION AS A FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER."FQHC LOOK-ALIKE." A PUBLIC OR NOT-FOR-PROFIT HEALTH CENTER 20250SB0614PN1530 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THAT MEETS THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS TO RECEIVE A FEDERAL PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES GRANT UNDER THE PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICE ACT BUT DOES NOT RECEIVE GRANT FUNDING."INITIATIVE." THE FACILITATING ENTITY PRIMARY CARE WORKFORCE INITIATIVE ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 102-M."PARTICIPATING FQHC." AN FQHC OR FQHC LOOK-ALIKE THAT PARTICIPATES IN THE INITIATIVE ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 102-M."Physician." A medical doctor licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1985 or a doctor of osteopathic medicine licensed under the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act."Physician assistant." An individual licensed as a physician assistant under the Medical Practice Act of 1985 or the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act."Preceptor." A primary care practitioner supervising or directing a student enrolled in the FQHC primary care workforce initiative."Primary care practitioner." A physician, physician assistant, certified registered nurse practitioner, dentist or psychiatrist employed by a FQHC FACILITATING ENTITY . "Student." An individual currently satisfying clinical rotation from an accredited medical college at a FQHC and enrolled in the FQHC primary care workforce initiative. WHO IS: (1) ENROLLED IN AN ACCREDITED MEDICAL COLLEGE;(2) FULFILLING THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE MEDICAL COLLEGE; AND(3) ENROLLED IN OR SEEKING TO BE ENROLLED IN THE INITIATIVE.Section 102-M. FQHC FACILITATING ENTITY primary care workforce initiative.(a) Establishment.-- Within one year of NOT LATER THAN ONE 20250SB0614PN1530 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 YEAR AFTER the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish the FQHC FACILITATING ENTITY primary care workforce initiative within the department.(b) Purpose.--The FQHC primary care workforce initiative shall be a voluntary program to offer a clinical rotation placement at a FQHC THROUGH WHICH A PARTICIPATING FQHC, FQHC LOOK-ALIKE, RURAL HOSPITAL OR RURAL HEALTH CLINIC OFFERS CLINICAL ROTATION PLACEMENTS AT THEIR RESPECTIVE FACILITIES for a student attending an accredited medical college.(c) Funding.--The department shall make grant funding available if sufficient Federal funds, made available from the One Big Beautiful Bill Act (Public Law 119-21, 139 Stat. 72), have been appropriated.(C) FUNDING.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE GRANT FUNDING AVAILABLE FOR THE INITIATIVE IF SUFFICIENT FEDERAL FUNDS, MADE AVAILABLE FROM THE ONE BIG BEAUTIFUL BILL ACT (PUBLIC LAW 119-21, 139 STAT. 72), HAVE BEEN APPROPRIATED.(2) NOT LESS THAN 50% OF FUNDS EXPENDED EACH FISCAL YEAR UNDER THE INITIATIVE SHALL BE USED FOR PRECEPTORSHIPS INVOLVING STUDENTS DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THE DEFINITION OF "STUDENT" IN SECTION 101-M. IF SUFFICIENT APPLICANTS FROM STUDENTS DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THE DEFINITION OF "STUDENT" IN SECTION 101-M ARE NOT FILLED AFTER EVERY REASONABLE RECRUITMENT EFFORT BY THE DEPARTMENT AT FACILITATING ENTITIES AND PARTICIPATING TRAINING SITES, THE REMAINING FUNDS MAY BE ALLOCATED TO OTHER ELIGIBLE STUDENTS PARTICIPATING IN THE INITIATIVE.(D) ADMINISTRATION FOR FQHCS AND FQHC LOOK-ALIKES.--FOR ADMINISTRATION OF THE INITIATIVE WITH RESPECT TO PARTICIPATING 20250SB0614PN1530 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FQHCS AND FQHC LOOK-ALIKES, THE DEPARTMENT MAY AWARD GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE ADMINISTRATIVE ENTITIES TO ADMINISTER AND FACILITATE STUDENT PLACEMENT, PRECEPTOR SUPPORT, REPORTING AND OTHER FUNCTIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE INITIATIVE.(d) (E) Sustainability.--The department and any participating hospital AND THE ELIGIBLE FACILITATING ENTITY shall make every effort to combine funding available under subsection (c) with grants or other funding available through hospitals, local governments, nonprofit organizations, philanthropic public or private partnerships or State-level continuation funding to ensure the long-term sustainability of the program INITIATIVE . Grants awarded under this section shall be conditioned on the submission of a sustainability plan that demonstrates how clinical placements will continue beyond five years from the date the grant was awarded, including evidence of public-private or philanthropic partnership support.(e) Geographic distribution.--The department(F) GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT shall ensure that clinical rotation placements funded under this section are geographically distributed in a manner that strengthens rural health care workforce pipelines, with priority given to any FQHC FACILITATING ENTITY operating in, or primarily serving populations of, a rural county. The COUNTY. (2) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE term "rural county" shall mean a county located within this Commonwealth with a population density of less than 291 persons per square mile as defined by the Center for Rural Pennsylvania.(f) Residency preference.--Any hospital in a rural area shall have the first right to extend offers of residency 20250SB0614PN1530 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 placement to students who complete clinical rotations funded under this section, where appropriate.(g) Grant awards.--Grants awarded by the department under this section shall be equal amounts to each FQHC in this Commonwealth that is enrolled in the FQHC primary care workforce initiative as a stipend to support a preceptor or student.(G) RESIDENCY PLACEMENT PREFERENCE.--A FACILITATING ENTITY MAY PROMOTE AND ASSIST STUDENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (I) IN PURSUING EARLY OR ALTERNATIVE RESIDENCY PLACEMENT PATHWAYS PERMITTED OUTSIDE A NATIONAL RESIDENCY MATCHING PROCESS OR SUCCESSOR SYSTEM AND SHALL HAVE THE FIRST OPPORTUNITY TO OFFER OR FACILITATE RESIDENCY PLACEMENT TO THOSE STUDENTS.(H) GRANT AWARDS.--GRANTS AWARDED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING GRANTS ADMINISTERED THROUGH AN ELIGIBLE ADMINISTRATIVE ENTITY:(1) SHALL BE EQUAL AMOUNTS TO EACH FACILITATING ENTITY, INCLUDING AN FQHC, FQHC LOOK-ALIKE, RURAL HOSPITAL OR RURAL HEALTH CLINIC ENROLLED IN THE INITIATIVE.(2) MAY ONLY BE USED AS A STIPEND TO SUPPORT A PRECEPTOR OR STUDENT.(I) FUNDING PRIORITY.--A FACILITATING ENTITY MAY GIVE HIGHEST FUNDING PRIORITY TO PRECEPTORSHIPS INVOLVING STUDENTS WHO:(1) HAVE COMPLETED AT LEAST ONE PRIOR TERM OR PLACEMENT THROUGH THE PROGRAM; OR(2) ARE ENROLLED IN THEIR PENULTIMATE OR FINAL ACADEMIC YEAR OF THEIR EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM.(J) REPORTING REQUIREMENT.--(1) NOT LATER THAN FOUR YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION AND ANNUALLY THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT 20250SB0614PN1530 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL COLLECT DATA AND SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE RESULTS OF THE INITIATIVE TO THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE HEALTH COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY AWARDED AND EXPENDED UNDER THE INITIATIVE;(II) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS WHO APPLIED FOR, PARTICIPATED IN OR COMPLETED CLINICAL ROTATIONS THROUGH THE INITIATIVE;(III) OUTCOME DATA, INCLUDING THE NUMBER OF PARTICIPATING STUDENTS WHO SUBSEQUENTLY COMPLETE THEIR DEGREE REQUIREMENTS AND BECOME EMPLOYED IN THE FIELD FOR WHICH THEY GRADUATED IN A RURAL COUNTY; AND(IV) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT DEEMS RELEVANT TO EVALUATING THE EFFECTIVENESS AND SUSTAINABILITY OF THE INITIATIVE.(2) A FACILITATING ENTITY SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS NECESSARY FOR REPORTING AND SHALL COOPERATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND PROVIDE SUCH DATA AND INFORMATION AS THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES NECESSARY AND REASONABLE TO PREPARE THE REPORT.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0614PN1530 - 8 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223